Tables/Contraction/zh-tw.cti
always \u5977 245-2345-3
always \u5978 13-2345-3
always \u5979 1248-345-3
always \u597A 13-234-4
always \u597B 1345-1236-2
always \u597C 12-345-5
always \u597D 1235-146-4
always \u597E 15-2345-3
always \u597F 12345-1236-5
always \u5980 13-16-4
always \u5981 24-25-5
always \u5982 1245-34-2
always \u5983 12345-356-3
always \u5984 456-5
always \u5985 1235-12346-2
always \u5986 1-456-3
always \u5987 12345-34-5
always \u5988 134-345-3
always \u5989 145-1236-3
always \u598A 1245-136-5
always \u598B 12345-34-3
always \u598C 13-13456-5
always \u598D 2345-2
always \u598E 1235-2456-5
always \u598F 123456-5
always \u5990 1-12346-3
always \u5991 1234-345-3
always \u5992 145-34-5
always \u5993 13-16-5
always \u5994 123-1356-3
always \u5995 1-12346-5
always \u5996 246-3
always \u5997 13-1456-5
always \u5998 256-2
always \u5999 134-246-5
always \u599A 1234-356-3
always \u599B 12-156-3
always \u599C 236-5
always \u599D 1-456-3
always \u599E 1345-234-3
always \u599F 2345-5
always \u59A0 1345-345-5
always \u59A1 15-1456-3
always \u59A2 12345-136-2
always \u59A3 135-16-4
always \u59A4 1256-2
always \u59A5 124-25-4
always \u59A6 12345-1356-3
always \u59A7 45-2
always \u59A8 12345-1346-2
always \u59A9 34-4
always \u59AA 1256-5
always \u59AB 13-1246-3
always \u59AC 145-34-5
always \u59AD 135-345-2
always \u59AE 1345-16-2
always \u59AF 1-12356-2
always \u59B0 1-25-2
always \u59B1 1-146-3
always \u59B2 145-345-2
always \u59B3 13458-16-4
always \u59B4 45-5
always \u59B5 124-12356-4
always \u59B6 15-45-2
always \u59B7 1-156-2
always \u59B8 2346-3
always \u59B9 134-356-5
always \u59BA 134-126-5
always \u59BB 245-16-3
always \u59BC 135-16-5
always \u59BD 24-136-3
always \u59BE 245-346-5
always \u59BF 2346-3
always \u59C0 1235-2346-2
always \u59C1 15-1256-4
always \u59C2 12345-345-2
always \u59C3 1-1356-3
always \u59C4 134-1456-2
always \u59C5 135-1236-5
always \u59C6 134-34-4
always \u59C7 12345-34-3
always \u59C8 14-13456-2
always \u59C9 13-346-4
always \u59CA 13-346-4
always \u59CB 24-156-4
always \u59CC 1245-1236-4
always \u59CD 24-1236-3
always \u59CE 46-3
always \u59CF 1345-1236-2
always \u59D0 13-346-4
always \u59D1 13-34-3
always \u59D2 15-156-5
always \u59D3 15-13456-5
always \u59D4 1246-4
always \u59D5 125-156-3
always \u59D6 13-1256-5
always \u59D7 24-1236-3
always \u59D8 1234-1456-3
always \u59D9 1245-136-5
always \u59DA 246-2
always \u59DB 124-12346-4
always \u59DC 13-46-3
always \u59DD 24-34-3
always \u59DE 13-16-2
always \u59DF 13-2456-3
always \u59E0 24-1346-5
always \u59E1 1235-35-2
always \u59E2 13-45-3
always \u59E3 13-246-4
always \u59E4 13-12356-5
always \u59E5 14-146-4
always \u59E6 13-2345-3
always \u59E7 13-2345-3
always \u59E8 16-2
always \u59E9 1345-2345-5
always \u59EA 1-156-2
always \u59EB 1-136-4
always \u59EC 13-16-3
always \u59ED 15-2345-5
always \u59EE 1235-1356-2
always \u59EF 13-456-3
always \u59F0 13-256-3
always \u59F1 123-35-3
always \u59F2 2345-5
always \u59F3 134-13456-4
always \u59F4 14-346-5
always \u59F5 1234-356-5
always \u59F6 2346-5
always \u59F7 234-5
always \u59F8 2345-2
always \u59F9 12-345-5
always \u59FA 15-2345-4
always \u59FB 1456-3
always \u59FC 24-156-2
always \u59FD 13-1246-4
always \u59FE 245-45-3
always \u59FF 125-156-3
always \u5A00 15-12346-3
always \u5A01 1246-3
always \u5A02 1235-12346-2
always \u5A03 35-2
always \u5A04 14-12356-2
always \u5A05 23456-5
always \u5A06 1245-146-2
always \u5A07 13-246-3
always \u5A08 14-12456-2
always \u5A09 1234-13456-3
always \u5A0A 15-2345-5
always \u5A0B 24-146-5
always \u5A0C 14-16-4
always \u5A0D 12-1356-2
always \u5A0E 15-246-5
always \u5A0F 134-1346-2
always \u5A10 12345-34-3
always \u5A11 15-25-3
always \u5A12 34-4
always \u5A13 1246-4
always \u5A14 123-2346-5
always \u5A15 14-2456-5
always \u5A16 12-25-5
always \u5A17 124-13456-4
always \u5A18 1345-46-2
always \u5A19 15-13456-2
always \u5A1A 1345-1236-2
always \u5A1B 1256-2
always \u5A1C 1345-345-5
always \u5A1D 1234-356-3
always \u5A1E 15-1246-3
always \u5A1F 13-45-3
always \u5A20 24-136-3
always \u5A21 1-156-5
always \u5A22 1235-1236-2
always \u5A23 145-16-5
always \u5A24 1-456-3
always \u5A25 2346-2
always \u5A26 1234-1456-2
always \u5A27 124-1246-5
always \u5A28 1235-1236-5
always \u5A29 134-2345-4
always \u5A2A 34-2
always \u5A2B 2345-2
always \u5A2C 34-4
always \u5A2D 15-16-3
always \u5A2E 2345-2
always \u5A2F 1256-2
always \u5A30 15-156-5
always \u5A31 1256-2
always \u5A32 35-3
always \u5A33 14-16-5
always \u5A34 15-2345-2
always \u5A35 13-1256-3
always \u5A36 245-1256-4
always \u5A37 24-1246-5
always \u5A38 245-16-3
always \u5A39 15-2345-2
always \u5A3A 1-1246-3
always \u5A3B 145-12346-3
always \u5A3C 12-1346-3
always \u5A3D 14-34-5
always \u5A3E 2456-4
always \u5A3F 2346-3
always \u5A40 2346-3
always \u5A41 14-12356-2
always \u5A42 134-2345-2
always \u5A43 245-12346-2
always \u5A44 1234-12356-4
always \u5A45 13-1256-2
always \u5A46 1234-126-2
always \u5A47 245-2456-4
always \u5A48 14-13456-2
always \u5A49 12456-4
always \u5A4A 135-246-4
always \u5A4B 15-246-3
always \u5A4C 24-34-4
always \u5A4D 245-16-4
always \u5A4E 1235-1246-3
always \u5A4F 12345-34-5
always \u5A50 25-4
always \u5A51 25-4
always \u5A52 124-1236-2
always \u5A53 12345-356-3
always \u5A54 12345-356-3
always \u5A55 13-346-2
always \u5A56 124-2345-3
always \u5A57 1345-16-2
always \u5A58 245-45-2
always \u5A59 13-13456-5
always \u5A5A 1235-123456-3
always \u5A5B 13-13456-3
always \u5A5C 245-2345-3
always \u5A5D 145-2345-5
always \u5A5E 15-13456-5
always \u5A5F 1235-34-5
always \u5A60 12456-3
always \u5A61 14-2456-2
always \u5A62 135-16-5
always \u5A63 1456-3
always \u5A64 1-12356-3
always \u5A65 12-25-5
always \u5A66 12345-34-5
always \u5A67 245-13456-5
always \u5A68 14-123456-2
always \u5A69 1236-5
always \u5A6A 14-1236-2
always \u5A6B 123-123456-3
always \u5A6C 1456-2
always \u5A6D 23456-5
always \u5A6E 13-1256-3
always \u5A6F 14-16-5
always \u5A70 145-2345-4
always \u5A71 15-2345-2
always \u5A72 12345-356-3
always \u5A73 1235-35-5
always \u5A74 13456-3
always \u5A75 12-1236-2
always \u5A76 24-136-4
always \u5A77 124-13456-2
always \u5A78 46-2
always \u5A79 246-4
always \u5A7A 34-5
always \u5A7B 1345-1236-5
always \u5A7C 1245-25-5
always \u5A7D 13-23456-4
always \u5A7E 124-12356-3
always \u5A7F 15-1256-5
always \u5A80 1256-2
always \u5A81 1246-3
always \u5A82 124-16-2
always \u5A83 1245-12356-2
always \u5A84 134-356-4
always \u5A85 145-1236-3
always \u5A86 1245-12456-4
always \u5A87 245-1456-3
always \u5A88 1235-1246-3
always \u5A89 34-3
always \u5A8A 245-2345-2
always \u5A8B 12-123456-3
always \u5A8C 134-246-2
always \u5A8D 12345-34-5
always \u5A8E 13-346-4
always \u5A8F 145-12456-3
always \u5A90 15-16-3
always \u5A91 1-12346-5
always \u5A92 134-356-2
always \u5A93 1235-456-2
always \u5A94 134-2345-2
always \u5A95 1236-3
always \u5A96 13456-3
always \u5A97 15-45-3
always \u5A98 13-346-3
always \u5A99 1246-3
always \u5A9A 134-356-5
always \u5A9B 45-2
always \u5A9C 1-136-3
always \u5A9D 245-234-3
always \u5A9E 124-16-2
always \u5A9F 15-346-5
always \u5AA0 145-25-5
always \u5AA1 14-2345-5
always \u5AA2 134-146-5
always \u5AA3 1245-1236-4
always \u5AA4 15-156-3
always \u5AA5 1234-2345-3
always \u5AA6 1246-5
always \u5AA7 35-3
always \u5AA8 13-234-5
always \u5AA9 1235-34-2
always \u5AAA 146-4
always \u5AAB 13-346-2
always \u5AAC 135-146-4
always \u5AAD 15-1256-3
always \u5AAE 124-12356-3
always \u5AAF 13-1246-3
always \u5AB0 125-12356-3
always \u5AB1 246-2
always \u5AB2 1234-16-5
always \u5AB3 15-16-2
always \u5AB4 45-2
always \u5AB5 13456-5
always \u5AB6 1245-12346-2
always \u5AB7 1245-34-5
always \u5AB8 12-156-3
always \u5AB9 14-234-2
always \u5ABA 134-356-4
always \u5ABB 1234-1236-2
always \u5ABC 146-4
always \u5ABD 134-345-3
always \u5ABE 13-12356-5
always \u5ABF 123-1246-5
always \u5AC0 245-1456-2
always \u5AC1 13-23456-5
always \u5AC2 15-146-4
always \u5AC3 1-136-3
always \u5AC4 45-2
always \u5AC5 12-345-3
always \u5AC6 235-2
always \u5AC7 134-13456-2
always \u5AC8 13456-3
always \u5AC9 13-16-2
always \u5ACA 15-34-5
always \u5ACB 1345-246-4
always \u5ACC 15-2345-2
always \u5ACD 124-146-3
always \u5ACE 1234-1346-2
always \u5ACF 14-1346-2
always \u5AD0 1345-146-4
always \u5AD1 135-246-2
always \u5AD2 2456-5
always \u5AD3 1234-16-5
always \u5AD4 1234-1456-2
always \u5AD5 16-5
always \u5AD6 1234-246-2
always \u5AD7 1256-5
always \u5AD8 14-356-2
always \u5AD9 15-45-2
always \u5ADA 134-1236-5
always \u5ADB 16-3
always \u5ADC 1-1346-3
always \u5ADD 123-1346-3
always \u5ADE 235-3
always \u5ADF 1345-16-5
always \u5AE0 14-16-2
always \u5AE1 145-16-2
always \u5AE2 13-1246-3
always \u5AE3 2345-3
always \u5AE4 13-1456-5
always \u5AE5 1-12456-3
always \u5AE6 12-1346-2
always \u5AE7 245-2346-5
always \u5AE8 1235-1236-3
always \u5AE9 1345-136-5
always \u5AEA 14-146-5
always \u5AEB 134-126-2
always \u5AEC 1-2346-3
always \u5AED 1235-34-5
always \u5AEE 1235-34-5
always \u5AEF 146-5
always \u5AF0 1345-136-5
always \u5AF1 245-46-2
always \u5AF2 134-345-2
always \u5AF3 1234-346-5
always \u5AF4 13-34-3
always \u5AF5 34-4
always \u5AF6 245-246-2
always \u5AF7 124-25-4
always \u5AF8 1-1236-4
always \u5AF9 134-146-2
always \u5AFA 15-2345-2
always \u5AFB 15-2345-2
always \u5AFC 134-126-5
always \u5AFD 14-246-2
always \u5AFE 14-2345-2
always \u5AFF 1235-35-5
always \u5B00 13-1246-3
always \u5B01 145-1356-3
always \u5B02 1-156-3
always \u5B03 15-1256-3
always \u5B04 16-3
always \u5B05 1235-35-5
always \u5B06 15-16-3
always \u5B07 1235-1246-5
always \u5B08 1245-146-4
always \u5B09 15-16-3
always \u5B0A 2345-5
always \u5B0B 12-1236-2
always \u5B0C 13-246-3
always \u5B0D 134-356-4
always \u5B0E 12345-1236-5
always \u5B0F 12345-1236-3
always \u5B10 15-2345-3
always \u5B11 16-5
always \u5B12 1246-5
always \u5B13 13-246-5
always \u5B14 12345-34-5
always \u5B15 24-156-5
always \u5B16 135-16-5
always \u5B17 24-1236-5
always \u5B18 15-1246-5
always \u5B19 245-46-2
always \u5B1A 14-2345-2
always \u5B1B 1235-12456-2
always \u5B1C 15-1456-3
always \u5B1D 1345-246-4
always \u5B1E 145-12346-4
always \u5B1F 16-5
always \u5B20 245-1236-2
always \u5B21 2456-5
always \u5B22 1345-46-2
always \u5B23 1345-1356-2
always \u5B24 134-345-3
always \u5B25 124-246-4
always \u5B26 12-12356-2
always \u5B27 13-1456-5
always \u5B28 245-156-2
always \u5B29 1256-2
always \u5B2A 1234-1456-2
always \u5B2B 14-12346-2
always \u5B2C 1245-34-2
always \u5B2D 1345-2456-4
always \u5B2E 2345-3
always \u5B2F 124-2456-2
always \u5B30 13456-3
always \u5B31 245-1236-2
always \u5B32 1345-246-4
always \u5B33 236-5
always \u5B34 13456-2
always \u5B35 134-2345-2
always \u5B36 135-16-2
always \u5B37 134-126-2
always \u5B38 24-136-4
always \u5B39 15-13456-5
always \u5B3A 1345-16-5
always \u5B3B 145-34-2
always \u5B3C 14-234-4
always \u5B3D 45-3
always \u5B3E 14-1236-4
always \u5B3F 2345-4
always \u5B40 24-456-3
always \u5B41 14-13456-2
always \u5B42 13-246-4
always \u5B43 1345-46-2
always \u5B44 14-1236-4
always \u5B45 15-2345-3
always \u5B46 13456-3
always \u5B47 24-456-3
always \u5B48 1235-1246-5
always \u5B49 245-45-2
always \u5B4A 134-16-4
always \u5B4B 14-16-2
always \u5B4C 14-12456-2
always \u5B4D 2345-2
always \u5B4E 1-34-4
always \u5B4F 14-1236-4
always \u5B50 125-156-1
always \u5B51 13-346-2
always \u5B52 13-236-2
always \u5B53 13-236-2
always \u5B54 123-12346-4
always \u5B55 256-5
always \u5B56 125-156-3
always \u5B57 125-156-5
always \u5B58 245-123456-2
always \u5B59 15-123456-3
always \u5B5A 12345-34-2
always \u5B5B 135-126-2
always \u5B5C 125-156-3
always \u5B5D 15-246-5
always \u5B5E 15-1456-5
always \u5B5F 134-1356-5
always \u5B60 15-156-5
always \u5B61 124-2456-3
always \u5B62 135-146-3
always \u5B63 13-16-5
always \u5B64 13-34-3
always \u5B65 1345-34-2
always \u5B66 15-236-2
always \u5B67 234-5
always \u5B68 1-12456-4
always \u5B69 1235-2456-2
always \u5B6A 14-12456-2
always \u5B6B 15-123456-3
always \u5B6C 1345-146-3
always \u5B6D 134-346-3
always \u5B6E 245-12346-2
always \u5B6F 245-2345-3
always \u5B70 24-34-2
always \u5B71 12-1236-2
always \u5B72 23456-3
always \u5B73 125-156-3
always \u5B74 1345-16-4
always \u5B75 12345-34-3
